Nebraska, session 109, LB19.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB19 LB19
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 14-201, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
14-201 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the
primary election for the nomination of elective officers of cities of the
metropolitan class shall be held on the first Tuesday of April preceding
the date of the general election, and the In each city of the
metropolitan class, seven city council members shall be elected to the
city council as provided in section 32-536. The general city election for
the election of elective officers of cities of the metropolitan class
shall be held on the first Tuesday after the second Monday in May 1993
and every four years thereafter. The terms of office of such elective
officers city council members shall commence on the fourth Monday after
such election.
(2)(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of any ordinance or home rule
charter to the contrary, commencing with the statewide primary election
in 2028, and every four years thereafter, candidates for elective office
of a city of the metropolitan class shall be nominated at the statewide
primary election and elected at the statewide general election. The terms
of office of such elective officers shall commence on the fourth Monday
after such election.
(b) Any elective officer of a city of the metropolitan class serving
a term that commenced on the fourth Monday after the general election
held in May 2025 shall serve until the fourth Monday after the statewide
general election in 2028, except that such elective officer may run for
reelection to the same office commencing in 2028 as provided in
subdivision (2)(a) of this section.
Sec. 2. Section 14-202, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
14-202 The city council of a city of the metropolitan class is
authorized to call, by ordinance, special elections and to submit at such
elections such questions and propositions as may be authorized by law to
-2-

LB19 LB19
2025 2025
be submitted to the electors at a special election. Unless otherwise
specifically directed, it shall be sufficient to give, in the manner
required by law, thirty days' notice of the time and place of holding
such special election. Unless otherwise specifically designated, a
majority vote of the electors voting on any proposition shall be regarded
sufficient to approve or carry such proposition. The vote at such special
election shall be canvassed by the authority or officer authorized to
canvass the vote at the general city election for the election of
elective officers of the city, and the result of such election certified
or declared and certificate of election, if required, shall be issued.
Sec. 3. Section 14-204, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
14-204 (1) Each city of the metropolitan class shall elect seven
city council members to the city council as provided in section 32-536. A
candidate for city council member of a city of the metropolitan class
shall be a registered voter and a resident of the district from which
such candidate he or she seeks election and shall have been a resident in
the city and district or any area annexed by the city for six months. The
primary election for nomination of city council members shall be held on
the first Tuesday of April preceding the date of the general city
election.
(2) Any person desiring to become a candidate for city council
member shall file a candidate filing form pursuant to sections 32-606 and
32-607.
Sec. 4. Section 14-205, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
14-205 Notwithstanding any more general law respecting primary
elections in force in this state, the official ballot to be prepared and
used at the primary election under section 14-201 14-204 shall be in
substantially the form provided in this section. The names of all
candidates shall be placed upon the ballot without any party designation.
-3-

LB19 LB19
2025 2025
Candidate for Nomination for City Council Member from City Council
District No. .............., of the City of ..............., at the
Primary Election
Vote for only one:
.........................
(Names of candidates)
In all other respects the general character of the ballot to be used
shall be the same as authorized by the Election Act.
In printing, the names shall not be arranged alphabetically but
shall be rotated according to the following plan: The form shall be set
up by the printer, with the names in the order in which they are placed
upon the sample ballot prepared by the officer authorized to conduct the
general city election. In printing the ballots for the various election
districts or precincts, the position of the names shall be changed for
each election district, and in making the change of position the printer
shall take the line of type containing the name at the head of the form
and place it at the bottom, moving shoving up the column up so that the
name that was second before the change shall be the first after the
change. The primary election shall be conducted pursuant to the Election
Act except as provided in section 14-201 14-204 and unless otherwise
provided in the home rule charter or city code.
Sec. 5. Section 14-206, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
14-206 The two candidates receiving the highest number of votes in
each city council district at the primary election under section 14-201
14-204 shall be the candidates and the only candidates whose names shall
be placed upon the official ballot for city council members in such city
council district at the general city election in such city.
Sec. 6. Section 14-207, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
14-207 At the general city election at which city council members
-4-

LB19 LB19
2025 2025
are to be elected, the ballot shall be prepared in substantially the same
form as provided in section 14-205, and the person receiving the highest
number of votes in each of the city council districts shall be the city
council member elected. The general city election shall be conducted
pursuant to the Election Act unless otherwise provided in the home rule
charter or city code.
Sec. 7. Section 14-210, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
14-210 (1) The right to enact ordinances for any city of the
metropolitan class is hereby granted to the qualified electors of such
city, but such grant is made upon the following conditions and in
addition to the right granted to the city council to legislate as
provided in this section.
(2)(a) Whenever qualified electors of any city of the metropolitan
class equal in number to fifteen percent of the vote cast at the last
preceding city election for the election of elective officers of the city
petition the city council to enact a proposed ordinance, it shall be the
duty of the city council to either enact such ordinance without amendment
within thirty days or submit such ordinance to a vote of the people at
the next election held within such city regardless of whether such
election be a city, county, or state election.
(b) Whenever such proposed ordinance is petitioned for by qualified
electors equal in number to twenty-five percent of the votes cast at the
last preceding city election for the election of elective officers of the
city and such petition requests that a special election be called to
submit the proposed ordinance to a vote of the people in the event that
the city council shall fail to enact such ordinance, the city council
shall either enact such ordinance without amendment within thirty days or
submit such ordinance to a vote of the people at a special election
called by the city council for that purpose. The date of such election
shall not be less than fifty days nor more than seventy days after the
-5-

LB19 LB19
2025 2025
filing of the petition for the proposed ordinance.
(3) The petition provided for in this section shall be in the
general form and as to signatures and verification as provided in section
14-212 and shall be filed with the city clerk. Upon the filing of a
petition, the city clerk and the county clerk or election commissioner of
the county in which the city is located may by mutual agreement provide
that the county clerk or election commissioner shall ascertain whether
the petition is signed by the requisite number of voters. When the
verifying official has ascertained the percent of the voters signing such
petition, such official shall transmit the official's his or her
findings, together with such petition, to the city council.
(4) In the event the city council shall fail to enact such
ordinance, the city council shall submit such ordinance to a vote of the
people of such city as provided in this section. The mayor shall notify
the electors of such election at least fifteen days prior to such
election, and the city council shall cause to have published a notice of
the election and a copy of such proposed ordinance once in each of the
daily legal newspapers in or of general circulation in the city, or, if
there is no such newspaper, then once in each weekly legal newspaper in
or of general circulation in such city. Such publication shall be not
more than twenty nor less than five days prior to such election.
(5) All proposed ordinances shall have a title which shall state in
a general way the purpose and intent of such ordinance.
(6) The ballots used when voting upon such proposed ordinance shall
contain the following: For the ordinance (set forth the title thereof)
and Against the ordinance (set forth the title thereof).
(7) If a majority of the electors voting on the proposed ordinance
shall vote in favor of the question, such ordinance shall become a valid
and binding ordinance of the city. An ordinance adopted as provided in
this section shall not be altered or modified by the city council within
one year after such adoption.
-6-

LB19 LB19
2025 2025
(8) Any number of proposed ordinances may be voted upon at the same
election in accordance with the provisions of this section, except that
the same measure, either in form or essential substance, shall not be
submitted more often than once every two years.
Sec. 8. Section 14-211, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
14-211 (1)(a) No ordinance passed by the city council of a city of
the metropolitan class, except when otherwise required by the general
laws of the state, by other provisions of sections 14-201 to 14-229, or
as provided in subdivision (1)(b) of this section, shall go into effect
before fifteen days from the time of its final passage.
(b) An ordinance passed by the city council of a city of the
metropolitan class may take effect sooner than fifteen days from the time
of its final passage if the ordinance is:
(i) For the appropriation of money to pay the salary of officers or
employees of the city other than salaries of the mayor and city council
members; or
(ii) An emergency ordinance that is for the preservation of the
public peace, health, or safety and that contains a statement of such
emergency.
(2)(a) If during such fifteen days a petition, signed and verified
as provided in this section by electors of the city equal in number to at
least fifteen percent of the highest number of votes cast for any city
council member at the last preceding general city election, protesting
against the passage of such ordinance, shall be presented to the city
council, then such ordinance shall be suspended from going into
operation, and it shall be the duty of the city council to reconsider
such ordinance.
(b) If such ordinance is not repealed by the city council, then the
city council shall proceed to submit to the voters such ordinance at a
special election to be called for such purpose or at a general city
-7-

LB19 LB19
2025 2025
election, and such ordinance shall not go into effect or become operative
unless a majority of the qualified electors voting on such ordinance
shall vote in favor of the question.
(3) Such petition shall be in all respects in accordance with the
provisions of section 14-212 relating to signatures, verification,
inspection, and certification.
Sec. 9. Section 14-217.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
14-217.01 Each A city of the metropolitan class shall elect a mayor
as provided in section 32-536 whose for such term of office shall
coincide with the terms of city council members elected concurrently to
the city council as may be provided by the laws and ordinances of such
city.
Sec. 10. Section 14-376, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
14-376 Whenever the qualified electors of any city of the
metropolitan class vote at any general or special election to acquire and
appropriate by an exercise of the power of eminent domain, any
waterworks, waterworks system, gas plant, electric light plant, electric
light and power plant, street railway, or street railway system, located
or operating within or partly within and partly without such city if the
main part of such works, plant, or system be within such city and even
though a franchise for the construction and operation of such works,
plant, or system may or may not have expired, then the city shall have
the power and authority by an exercise of the power of eminent domain to
appropriate and acquire for the public use of the city, such works,
plant, or system. The procedure to condemn property shall be exercised in
the manner set forth in sections 76-704 to 76-724. The city council shall
have the power to submit such question or proposition to the qualified
electors of the city at any general city election or at any special city
election and may submit such proposition in connection with any city
-8-

LB19 LB19
2025 2025
special election called for any other purpose, and the votes cast on such
question shall be canvassed and the result found and declared as in any
general other city election for the election of elective officers of the
city. The city council shall submit such question at any such election
whenever a petition asking for such submission is signed by the legal
voters of the city equaling in number fifteen percent of the votes cast
at the last general city election for the election of elective officers
of the city, and is filed in the city clerk's office at least fifteen
days before the election at which the submission is asked.
Sec. 11. Section 14-521, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
14-521 The city council of a city of the metropolitan class may
issue bonds, as provided in this section, for the purpose of improving
lands, lots, or grounds purchased, appropriated, or acquired for parks,
parkways, boulevards, or playgrounds. Bonds so issued shall be known as
park bonds and the issuance of such bonds except as provided in this
section shall be governed by section 14-515. The city council may issue
in any one year and without a vote of the electors one hundred thousand
dollars of such bonds. The city council may also issue such bonds if
authorized by a majority vote of the electors of the city voting on the
proposition at a general city election or a special election called for
that purpose. A part of the proceeds from the sale of such bonds may be
used to pay for improvements upon streets, sidewalks, or thoroughfares
abutting upon or immediately adjacent to parks, parkways, boulevards, and
playgrounds when such costs would otherwise be chargeable to the city.
Sec. 12. Section 14-811, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
14-811 Any ordinance or resolution granting, extending, changing, or
modifying the terms and conditions of a franchise in a city of the
metropolitan class shall not be passed until at least four weeks have
elapsed after its introduction or proposal, and not until such resolution
-9-

LB19 LB19
2025 2025
or ordinance has been published daily for at least two weeks in the
official newspaper of the city. Such ordinance or resolution shall not
become effective or binding until submitted to the electors and approved
by a majority vote of such electors. Submission to the electors shall be
made as provided in section 14-202. A new franchise shall not hereafter
be granted or any modification or extension of any existing franchise
made unless an annuity or royalty be provided and reserved to the city to
be based either upon a fixed reasonable amount per year or a fixed
percentage of the earnings under the operation of the franchise so
granted, and not then until such franchise has been submitted to a vote
and approved by the electors at a general city election or a special
election called for that purpose.
Sec. 13. Section 14-1206, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
14-1206 (1) If any city of the metropolitan class desires to
purchase, lease, or sublease any existing bridge and shall have received
any such authority as may be necessary from the government of the United
States, the city council may determine the fair value of such bridge, the
appraised value of which shall not exceed two million dollars, including
all interests of any nature in such bridge, and may by written resolution
tentatively offer the owners of such bridge jointly the price so
determined.
(2) If all such owners within ninety days thereafter shall file with
the city clerk of such city a duly authorized and properly executed
written tentative acceptance of such offer, binding themselves to accept
such offer and to assign such lease or sublease or convey good and
complete title by warranty deed when and if the necessary funds shall be
provided for such offer, then upon the filing of such acceptance, the
city council may submit to the electors of such city, at a special
election called for that purpose or at any general election of such city
or of the State of Nebraska within one hundred and twenty days after the
-10-

LB19 LB19
2025 2025
filing of such acceptance, the question whether such purchase shall be
made at the price stated on the ballot and the city council be authorized
to issue bonds of the kind or kinds stated in the proposition and in any
such amount as may be required to provide the necessary funds. The
proposition so submitted shall be carried if the majority of the electors
voting on such proposition shall vote in favor of such proposition.
(3) No election and no vote of electors shall be required upon the
question of acquiring by purchase, lease, or sublease any existing bridge
or issuing revenue bonds, in an amount not to exceed two million dollars
as authorized by section 14-1217, for the acquisition by purchase, lease,
or sublease of any existing bridge, if the city council determines by a
vote of a majority of its members to dispense with such election or vote
of electors as to such question.
(4) If the proposition shall be carried at the election, or if the
city council determines to dispense with such election, the tentative
acceptance of the owners of such bridge shall then become final and
binding upon such owners and may be enforced in any court of competent
jurisdiction.
(5) Such purchase may also be made subject to existing mortgages and
the assumption of outstanding bonds.
(6) If repairs, reconditioning, or reconstruction shall be necessary
to place any bridge so purchased or to be purchased in safe, efficient,
or convenient condition, the city council may issue additional revenue
bonds to provide funds for such purpose in an amount not to exceed
fifteen percent of the purchase price of such bridge.
(7) Any proposition submitted to the electors shall be published on
three consecutive days in the official newspaper of the city to be
completed not less than ten days before the date of the election.
(8) If the city council determines to dispense with such election or
vote of the electors, or if a proposition is submitted to a vote of the
electors and carried at such election, the city council may exercise all
-11-

LB19 LB19
2025 2025
power and authority reasonably necessary and incidental to the exercise
of the powers granted in this section.
Sec. 14. Section 14-1211, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
14-1211 (1) Within ninety days after a final condemnation award
pursuant to section 14-1207 has been made, the city council of such city
of the metropolitan class shall, if such city council elects to proceed
further, introduce an ordinance providing for the submission to the
electors of the city the question whether such award shall be confirmed
and the property be taken and bonds of the kind or kinds determined by
the city council, and stated upon the ballot, shall be issued in the
amount of the award.
(2) Such proposition shall be submitted within ninety days after the
ordinance becomes effective at a special election called for that purpose
or at any general city or state election , and shall be carried if a
majority of the electors voting on such proposition shall vote in favor
of such proposition.
(3) No election and no vote of electors shall be required upon the
question of acquiring by condemnation any bridge or issuing revenue bonds
as authorized by section 14-1217 for the acquisition by condemnation of
any existing bridge, if the city council determines by a vote of a
majority of its members to dispense with such election or vote of
electors as to such question.
Sec. 15. Section 14-1216, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
14-1216 (1) To finance any of the purposes or powers provided for in
sections 14-1201 to 14-1252, the city council of a city of the
metropolitan class shall in the first instance determine whether any
purchase, condemnation, or construction authorized by such sections shall
be financed by bonds which are general obligations of the city and which
may also be supported by a lien or mortgage on the bridge itself or upon
-12-

LB19 LB19
2025 2025
the collection of tolls to be derived from the use of such bridge, or
both, or by revenue bonds as provided for in section 14-1217 and which
are charged solely against the revenue to be derived from such bridge
through the collection of tolls, or part one kind of bonds and part the
other.
(2) The city council shall not have authority to purchase, condemn,
nor construct any bridge nor to issue any bonds, except the preliminary
bonds specially authorized by section 14-1215, until first authorized by
the majority vote of the electors voting on such proposition, which
proposition shall indicate the method of acquiring the bridge and the
kind or kinds of bonds, at a special election called for that purpose or
at any general city or state election. No election and no vote of
electors shall be required upon the question of acquiring or constructing
any bridge or issuing revenue bonds as authorized by section 14-1217, for
the acquisition or construction of any bridge located more than one mile
from any existing bridge, other than a railroad bridge, if the city
council determines by a vote of the majority of its members to dispense
with such election or vote of electors as to such question.
(3) This grant of power to issue bonds is in addition to any other
power which may now have been or hereafter may be conferred upon such
city, and shall be free from the restrictions now imposed by the home
rule charter of the city upon the issuance of bonds and incurring of
indebtedness, and subject only to the provisions of the Constitution of
Nebraska.
(4) At an election under subsection (2) of this section, the
proposition shall be separate as to the bonds for each bridge to be
acquired or constructed and the amount of bonds may be either a specific
amount equal to the estimated total cost of every nature plus not to
exceed twenty-five percent, or may be general and authorize the issuance
of bonds in such amount as may be found necessary from time to time to
complete the acquisition, construction, and equipment of the bridge and
-13-

LB19 LB19
2025 2025
all costs incident to such bridge, or may be part one and part the other.
(5) For all purposes of financing, the total cost of any improvement
authorized by sections 14-1201 to 14-1252 may include every item of
expense in connection with the project, and among other items shall also
include the cost of acquiring every interest of every nature and of every
person in any existing bridge; the cost of constructing the
superstructure, roadway, and substructure of any bridge; the approaches
and avenues or rights-of-way of access to such bridge; necessary real
estate in connection with such bridge; toll houses; equipment of such
bridge; franchises, easements, rights, or damages incident to or
consequent upon the complete project expenses preliminary to
construction, including investigation and expenses incident to such
construction; prior to and during construction the proper traffic
estimates; interest upon bonds; and all such other expenses as after the
beginning of operation would be properly chargeable as cost of operation,
maintenance, and repairs.
Sec. 16. Section 14-1251, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
14-1251 (1) Elections on propositions arising in connection with the
exercise of any of the powers granted by sections 14-1201 to 14-1252 may
be submitted by the city council of a city of the metropolitan class to
the electors of such city at any general , city, or state election or at
any special election called for that purpose. Any proposition shall be
carried if a majority of the electors voting on such proposition vote in
favor of such proposition.
(2) No bridge shall be finally or irrevocably acquired, whether by
purchase, condemnation, or construction, until such action and the
necessary financing have been approved by a majority of the electors
voting on the proposition at a general city or state election or at a
special election called for that purpose or have been approved by the
city council, as authorized by such sections.
-14-

LB19 LB19
2025 2025
(3) Two or more propositions or questions may be submitted at the
same election and on the same ballot provided each is so presented that
the electors may vote separately upon each proposition. A vote of the
electors authorizing independent action shall be held to also authorize
joint action for the purpose so authorized but a vote on a proposition of
joint action shall not be held to authorize independent action.
(4) The city council is authorized to determine what shall be
included in the proposition to be stated in notices of election and upon
the ballots in its full discretion, except that any proposition must
indicate whether the bridge shall be acquired by purchase, by the
condemnation of an existing bridge, or by the construction of a new
bridge, and the kind of bonds to be issued to finance such bridge and the
amount of such bonds may be set forth in any manner authorized in such
sections.
Sec. 17. Section 32-402, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
32-402 Any primary election other than a primary election provided
for in sections 14-201 14-204 and 32-401 shall be held on Tuesday four
weeks before the general election.
Sec. 18. Section 32-536, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
32-536 In a city of the metropolitan class, the mayor and seven city
council members shall be elected to the city council for terms of four
years at the general city election in 1993 pursuant to section 14-201.
One city council member shall be nominated and elected from each of the
districts into which the city is divided pursuant to section 14-201.03.
The city council members shall meet the qualifications found in sections
14-204 and 14-230.
Sec. 19. Section 32-554, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
32-554 (1)(a) Any city not under a home rule charter, village,
-15-

LB19 LB19
2025 2025
county, or school district nominating and electing members to its
governing board at large may, either by majority vote of the governing
body or by petition of registered voters pursuant to subsection (2) of
this section, submit, at a general election, the question of nominating
and electing members to its governing board by district or ward.
(b) Any city not under a home rule charter, village, county having
not more than four hundred thousand inhabitants as determined by the most
recent federal decennial census, or school district nominating and
electing members to its governing board by district or ward may, either
by majority vote of the governing body or by petition of registered
voters pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, submit, at a general
election, the question of nominating and electing members to its
governing board at large.
(c) Any city of the first class, except a city having adopted the
commissioner or city manager plan of government, nominating and electing
members to its governing body by ward may, either by ordinance by
majority vote of the governing body or by petition of registered voters
pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, submit, at a general
election, the question of nominating and electing some of the members to
its governing body by ward and some at large. No more than four members
of the city council may be elected on an at-large basis, and at least
four members of the city council shall be elected by ward. The ordinance
of the governing body or petition shall specify the number of at-large
members to be elected. At the first election in which one or more at-
large members are to be elected to the city council, the members shall be
elected to serve for initial terms of office of the following lengths:
(i) If one at-large member is to be elected, he or she shall serve for a
four-year term; (ii) if two at-large members are to be elected, the
candidate receiving the highest number of votes shall be elected to serve
for a four-year term and the other elected member shall be elected to
serve for a two-year term; (iii) if three at-large members are to be
-16-

LB19 LB19
2025 2025
elected, the two candidates receiving the highest number of votes shall
be elected to serve for four-year terms and the other elected member
shall be elected to serve for a two-year term; and (iv) if four at-large
members are to be elected, the two candidates receiving the highest
number of votes shall be elected to serve for four-year terms and the
other elected members shall be elected to serve for two-year terms.
Following the initial term of office, all at-large council members shall
be elected to serve for four-year terms. No candidate may file as both an
at-large candidate and a candidate by ward at the same election.
(2) Petitions for submission of the question shall be signed by
registered voters of the city, village, county, or school district
desiring to change the procedures for electing the governing board of the
city, village, county, or school district. The petition or petitions
shall be signed by registered voters equal in number to twenty-five
percent of the votes cast for the person receiving the highest number of
votes in the city, village, county, or school district at the preceding
general election for electing the last member or members to its governing
board. Each sheet of the petition shall have printed the full and correct
copy of the question as it will appear on the official ballot. The
petitions shall be filed with the county clerk or election commissioner
not less than seventy days prior to the date of the general election, and
no signatures shall be added or removed from the petitions after they
have been so filed. Petitions shall be verified as provided in section
32-631. If the petition or petitions are found to contain the required
number of valid signatures, the county clerk or election commissioner
shall place the question on a separate ballot to be issued to the
registered voters of the city, village, county, or school district
entitled to vote on the question.
(3)(a) Any city, village, county, or school district voting to
change from nominating and electing the members of its governing board by
district or ward to nominating and electing some or all of such members
-17-

LB19 LB19
2025 2025
at large shall notify the public and instruct the filing officer to
accept the appropriate filings on an at-large basis. Candidates to be
elected at large shall be nominated and elected on an at-large basis at
the next primary and general election following submission of the
question.
(b) Any city, village, county, or school district voting to change
from nominating and electing the members of its governing board at large
to nominating and electing by district or ward shall notify the public
and instruct the filing officer to accept all filings by district or
ward. Candidates shall be nominated and elected by district or ward at
the next primary and general election following submission of the
question. When district or ward elections have been approved by the
majority of the electorate, the governing board of any city, village,
county, or school district approving such question shall establish
districts substantially equal in population as determined by the most
recent federal decennial census except as provided in subsection (2) of
section 32-553.
(4) Except as provided in section 14-204 14-201, each city not under
a home rule charter, village, county, and school district which votes to
nominate and elect members to its governing board by district or ward
shall establish districts or wards so that approximately one-half of the
members of its governing board may be nominated and elected from
districts or wards at each election. Districts or wards shall be created
not later than October 1 in the year following the general election at
which the question was voted upon. If the governing board fails to draw
district boundaries by October 1, the procedures set forth in section
32-555 shall be followed.
Sec. 20. Original sections 14-201, 14-202, 14-204, 14-205, 14-206,
14-207, 14-210, 14-217.01, 14-376, 14-521, 14-811, 14-1206, 14-1211,
14-1216, 14-1251, 32-402, 32-536, and 32-554, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and section 14-211, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
-18-

LB19 LB19
2025 2025
2024, are repealed.
-19-